Massachusetts, session 194th, H4155.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the 
licensing authority of the city known as the town of West Springfield may grant 4 additional 
licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to 
section 15 of said chapter 138, as follows: (i) 1 to Calabrese Market located at 54 Park Street; (ii) 
1 to Delaney's Market located at 334 Park Street (ili) 1 to KKK&P LLC (DBA The Country 
Store) located at 1022 Amostown Road; and (iv) 1 to Ye Olde Butcher Shoppe located at 68 
North Boulevard. The licenses shall be subject to all other provisions of said chapter 138 except 
said section 17. 
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted under this 
section to any other location but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same location 
if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a 

of 2 12 letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good 
standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been 
paid. 
(c) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this section or any 
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of 
the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the 
licensing authority may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant 
at the same location under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license 
shall dissolve. 
(d) A license granted under this section shall be issued within l year after the effective 
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may 
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (b) and (c) thereafter. 
SECTION 2. Upon the issuance of the license authorized in clause (iii) of subsection (a) 
of section 1, KKK&P LLC (DBA The Country Store) shall return physically, with all of the legal 
rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority, its license for the 
sale of wine and malt beverages not to be drunk on the premises under section 15 of chapter 138. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.